Sql advanced with notes
Data warehouse concepts
Aure real time project videos
Azure classes playlist
Pyspark classes or course
Python basics(teams videos) 
Power bi classes ( teams videos) 
Big data 9hours video

Hands-on: Stream + Batch + Power BI dashboa📅
 Phase 1 (Python + SQL) → Aug 25 – Oct 17


---

Week 1

Aug 25 (Mon)

Python: Variables & Data Types

Theory Q: What is the difference between mutable and immutable types in Python?

Code Q: Reverse a string without using slicing.


SQL: SELECT, WHERE

Theory Q: Difference between WHERE and HAVING clause?

Code Q: Query employees with salary > 50,000.



Aug 26 (Tue)

Python: Lists & Tuples

Theory Q: Why is a tuple faster than a list in Python?

Code Q: Find the 2nd largest number in a list.


SQL: ORDER BY, DISTINCT

Theory Q: What is the use of DISTINCT?

Code Q: Query top 3 highest salaries.



Aug 27 (Wed)

Python: Dictionaries & Sets

Theory Q: Why dictionary is faster than list for lookups?

Code Q: Count word frequency in a string.


SQL: Aggregate Functions

Theory Q: Difference between COUNT(*) and COUNT(column)?

Code Q: Find average salary per department.



Aug 28 (Thu)

Python: If-else, Loops

Theory Q: Difference between while and for loop?

Code Q: Check if a number is prime.


SQL: GROUP BY, HAVING

Theory Q: Why can’t we use WHERE with aggregate functions?

Code Q: Find departments with avg salary > 60k.



Aug 29 (Fri)

Python: Functions

Theory Q: What are default arguments in Python functions?

Code Q: Fibonacci series using recursion.


SQL: JOINS (INNER)

Theory Q: Difference between INNER JOIN and EQUIJOIN?

Code Q: Query employees with their department names.




---

Week 2

Sep 1 (Mon)

Python: Lambda, map, filter, reduce

Theory Q: When to use lambda vs def?

Code Q: Square all numbers in a list using map.


SQL: LEFT JOIN

Theory Q: Difference between LEFT JOIN and INNER JOIN?

Code Q: List all employees and their dept (even if dept missing).

                                                                    🐍 Python: List Comprehension
                                                                    ✅ Theory Q: What is the advantage of list comprehension?
                                                                    List comprehension is a concise way to create lists in Python. Instead of using loops, you write everything in a single line.
                                                                    
                                                                    🔹 Advantages:
                                                                    Cleaner syntax: Easier to read and write
                                                                    
                                                                    Faster execution: Optimized under the hood
                                                                    
                                                                    More Pythonic: Preferred in interviews and real codebases
                                                                    
                                                                    💡 Example comparison:
                                                                    
                                                                    python
                                                                    # Traditional loop
                                                                    evens = []
                                                                    for i in range(50):
                                                                        if i % 2 == 0:
                                                                            evens.append(i)
                                                                    
                                                                    # List comprehension
                                                                    evens = [i for i in range(50) if i % 2 == 0]
                                                                    🧮 Code Q: Generate even numbers less than 50
                                                                    python
                                                                    even_numbers = [i for i in range(50) if i % 2 == 0]
                                                                    print(even_numbers)
                                                                    🔍 Output: [0, 2, 4, 6, ..., 48]
                                                                    
                                                                    🗃️ SQL: RIGHT JOIN
                                                                    ✅ Theory Q: Difference between LEFT JOIN and RIGHT JOIN?
                                                                    Join Type	Description
                                                                    LEFT JOIN	Returns all rows from the left table, and matched rows from the right
                                                                    RIGHT JOIN	Returns all rows from the right table, and matched rows from the left
                                                                    💡 Think of it like this:
                                                                    
                                                                    LEFT JOIN = “Give me everything from Table A, even if Table B is missing”
                                                                    
                                                                    RIGHT JOIN = “Give me everything from Table B, even if Table A is missing”
                                                                    
                                                                    🧮 Code Q: List all departments and employees (even if employee missing)
                                                                    Assume two tables:
                                                                    
                                                                    sql
                                                                    Departments
                                                                    -----------
                                                                    DeptID | DeptName
                                                                       1   | HR
                                                                       2   | IT
                                                                       3   | Finance
                                                                    
                                                                    Employees
                                                                    ----------
                                                                    EmpID | EmpName | DeptID
                                                                     101  | Alice   | 1
                                                                     102  | Bob     | 2
                                                                    🔹 SQL Query:
                                                                    sql
                                                                    SELECT d.DeptName, e.EmpName
                                                                    FROM Employees e
                                                                    RIGHT JOIN Departments d ON e.DeptID = d.DeptID;
                                                                    🔍 Output:
                                                                    
                                                                    Code
                                                                    DeptName | EmpName
                                                                    HR       | Alice
                                                                    IT       | Bob
                                                                    Finance  | NULL   -- No employee in Finance
                                                                    🧠 How to Use This in Interviews
                                                                    When asked:
                                                                    
                                                                    “What’s the difference between LEFT and RIGHT JOIN?”
                                                                    
                                                                    You say:
                                                                    
                                                                    “LEFT JOIN keeps all rows from the left table, RIGHT JOIN keeps all rows from the right. For example, if I want to list all departments even if no employee is assigned, I’d use RIGHT JOIN.”
                                                                    
                                                                    When asked:
                                                                    
                                                                    “How do you generate even numbers in Python?”
                                                                    
                                                                    You say:
                                                                    
                                                                    “I’d use list comprehension for cleaner syntax: [i for i in range(50) if i % 2 == 0].”
                                                                    
                                                                    Sep 2 (Tue)
                                                                    
                                                                    Python: List comprehension
                                                                    
                                                                    Theory Q: Advantage of list comprehension?
                                                                    
                                                                    Code Q: Generate even numbers < 50.
                                                                    
                                                                    
                                                                    SQL: RIGHT JOIN
                                                                    
                                                                    Theory Q: Difference between LEFT and RIGHT join?
                                                                    
                                                                    Code Q: List all departments and employees (even if employee missing).



Sep 3 (Wed)

Python: Error handling (try, except)

Theory Q: Difference between Exception and Error in Python?

Code Q: Handle division by zero gracefully.

SQL: FULL OUTER JOIN
                                                                     
Theory Q: When to use FULL OUTER JOIN?
                                                                     
Code Q: List all employees and all departments.
                                                                     🐍 PYTHON: Error Handling (try, except)
                                                                     🔹 What is Error Handling?
                                                                     Imagine you're driving a car and suddenly a pothole appears. Instead of crashing, you slow down and steer around it. That’s what error handling does in code—it prevents your program from crashing when something unexpected happens.
                                                                     
                                                                     ✅ What’s the Difference Between Error and Exception?
                                                                     Term	Meaning	Can be handled?
                                                                     Error	Serious issues like syntax mistakes or memory overflow	❌ No
                                                                     Exception	Runtime problems like dividing by zero or missing files	✅ Yes
                                                                     Examples:
                                                                     
                                                                     SyntaxError: You forgot a colon or bracket → Error
                                                                     
                                                                     ZeroDivisionError: You tried dividing by 0 → Exception
                                                                     
                                                                     🔹 Why Use try and except?
                                                                     To catch exceptions and respond gracefully.
                                                                     
                                                                     ✅ Syntax:
                                                                     python
                                                                     try:
                                                                         # risky code
                                                                     except ExceptionType:
                                                                         # what to do if error happens
                                                                     🧪 Code Example: Division by Zero
                                                                     python
                                                                     try:
                                                                         a = int(input("Enter numerator: "))
                                                                         b = int(input("Enter denominator: "))
                                                                         result = a / b
                                                                         print("Result:", result)
                                                                     except ZeroDivisionError:
                                                                         print("Oops! You can't divide by zero.")
                                                                     except ValueError:
                                                                         print("Please enter valid numbers.")
                                                                     🔍 Explanation:
                                                                     try: Runs the code that might fail
                                                                     
                                                                     except ZeroDivisionError: Catches division by zero
                                                                     
                                                                     except ValueError: Catches non-numeric input
                                                                     
                                                                     Program keeps running instead of crashing
                                                                     
                                                                     🧠 Bonus: finally and else
                                                                     finally: Runs no matter what, even if there’s an error
                                                                     
                                                                     else: Runs only if no error occurs
                                                                     
                                                                     python
                                                                     try:
                                                                         print("Trying...")
                                                                         x = 1 / 1
                                                                     except:
                                                                         print("Error occurred")
                                                                     else:
                                                                         print("No error!")
                                                                     finally:
                                                                         print("Always runs")
                                                                     🛢️ SQL: FULL OUTER JOIN
                                                                     🔹 What is a JOIN?
                                                                     A JOIN connects two tables based on a common column—like matching employee IDs with department IDs.
                                                                     
                                                                     ✅ Types of JOINs
                                                                     JOIN Type	What It Shows
                                                                     INNER JOIN	Only matching rows from both tables
                                                                     LEFT JOIN	All rows from left + matched from right
                                                                     RIGHT JOIN	All rows from right + matched from left
                                                                     FULL OUTER JOIN	All rows from both tables, matched or not
                                                                     🔍 FULL OUTER JOIN Explained
                                                                     Imagine two circles:
                                                                     
                                                                     One for employees
                                                                     
                                                                     One for departments
                                                                     
                                                                     A FULL OUTER JOIN gives you everything in both circles, even if there’s no match.
                                                                     
                                                                     🧪 Code Example: List All Employees and All Departments
                                                                     sql
                                                                     SELECT e.name, d.department_name
                                                                     FROM employees e
                                                                     FULL OUTER JOIN departments d
                                                                     ON e.department_id = d.id;
                                                                     ✅ What This Does:
                                                                     Shows employees with departments
                                                                     
                                                                     Shows departments with no employees
                                                                     
                                                                     Shows employees without departments
                                                                     
                                                                     Fills missing values with NULL
                                                                     
                                                                     🧠 Real-Life Analogy
                                                                     Think of a school:
                                                                     
                                                                     Some students are assigned to classes
                                                                     
                                                                     Some classes have no students
                                                                     
                                                                     Some students haven’t been assigned yet
                                                                     
                                                                     A FULL OUTER JOIN shows everyone and every class, even if they’re not connected.
                                                                     
                                                                     🎓 Summary for Sep 3 (Wed)
                                                                     Topic	What You Learned
                                                                     Python Error Handling	Use try, except, finally, else to manage runtime issues
                                                                     Exception vs Error	Exceptions can be caught; errors usually crash
                                                                     Division by Zero	Catch with ZeroDivisionError
                                                                     SQL FULL OUTER JOIN	Combines all rows from both tables, even unmatched ones
                                                                     Use Case	Great for audits, completeness checks, and data reconciliation
                                                                     
                                                               
                                                                     
                                                                     

Sep 4 (Thu)

Python: File Handling

Theory Q: Modes of opening files in Python?

Code Q: Count number of lines in a file.

SQL: UNION vs UNION ALL

Theory Q: Difference between UNION and UNION ALL?

Code Q: Combine employee names from two tables removing duplicates.

explain each and every term and all the stuff related to this concepts for thoery 
and practical wise even for a kid to understand 
and shoould also cover INterview point of view for a azure data engineer in 5/3 bank


                                                           🐍 PYTHON: File Handling

                                                                 r for read 
                                                                 w for overwrite 
                                                                 x for write if not exist 
                                                                 a for append at end and also creates if not exist 
                                                                 wb and rb for read and write binary 
                                                                 r+ is to read and write and at position(file must exist)

                                                           📘 Theory: Modes of Opening Files in Python
                                                           When you open a file using open(), you tell Python what you want to do with that file. That’s called the mode.
                                                           
                                                           Mode	Description	Interview Insight
                                                           'r'	Read mode (default). Opens file for reading. Fails if file doesn’t exist.	Used in ETL pipelines to read config or data files.
                                                           'w'	Write mode. Creates file or overwrites existing one.	Used to write logs or export data. Risk: overwrites existing files.
                                                           'a'	Append mode. Adds content to end of file.	Good for logging without losing previous entries.
                                                           'x'	Exclusive creation. Fails if file exists.	Used when you want to ensure no overwrite happens.
                                                           'b'	Binary mode. For non-text files (images, PDFs).	Used in secure data transfers or encryption.
                                                           't'	Text mode. Default for reading/writing strings.	Most common for CSV, TXT, JSON files.
                                                           'r+'	Read and write. Doesn’t truncate file.	Useful for updating config files or audit logs.
                                                           💡 Real-world tip: In banking, file handling is often used to process batch files, audit logs, or secure data exports. You must handle files safely to avoid data loss or compliance issues.
                                                           
                                                           🧪 Code: Count Number of Lines in a File
                                                           python
                                                           def count_lines(filename):
                                                               try:
                                                                   with open(filename, 'r') as f:
                                                                       lines = f.readlines()
                                                                       return len(lines)
                                                               except FileNotFoundError:
                                                                   print("File not found.")
                                                               except Exception as e:
                                                                   print("Error:", e)
                                                           
                                                           # Example usage
                                                           print(count_lines("transactions.txt"))
                                                           ✅ Explanation:
                                                           open(filename, 'r'): Opens file in read mode
                                                           
                                                           readlines(): Reads all lines into a list
                                                           
                                                           len(lines): Counts how many lines
                                                           
                                                           try-except: Handles missing file or other errors
                                                           
                                                           💡 Interview angle: You might be asked how to process large files efficiently. In that case, use a loop:
                                                           
                                                           python
                                                           count = 0
                                                           with open(filename, 'r') as f:
                                                               for _ in f:
                                                                   count += 1
                                                           This avoids loading the whole file into memory—important for big data!
                                                           
                                                           🛢️ SQL: UNION vs UNION ALL
                                                           📘 Theory: What’s the Difference?
                                                           Clause	What It Does	Interview Insight
                                                           UNION	Combines results from two queries and removes duplicates	Good for clean reporting or deduplicated dashboards
                                                           UNION ALL	Combines results and keeps duplicates	Faster and better for raw data aggregation or audit logs
                                                           💡 Real-world tip: In banking, you often merge data from multiple systems (e.g., loan and credit card systems). Use UNION when duplicates are bad (e.g., customer reports), and UNION ALL when you want full traceability.
                                                           
                                                           🧪 Code: Combine Employee Names from Two Tables (Remove Duplicates)
                                                           sql
                                                           SELECT name FROM employees_us
                                                           UNION
                                                           SELECT name FROM employees_india;
                                                           ✅ Explanation:
                                                           Combines names from both tables
                                                           
                                                           Removes duplicates automatically
                                                           
                                                           If you want to keep duplicates, use UNION ALL
                                                           
                                                           💡 Interview angle: You may be asked:
                                                           
                                                           How does UNION affect performance? (Answer: slower due to deduplication)
                                                           
                                                           How do you handle schema mismatch? (Answer: columns must match in number and type)
                                                           
                                                           🧠 How This Applies to Azure Data Engineering at 5/3 Bank
                                                           🔹 File Handling
                                                           You’ll work with Azure Data Lake, Blob Storage, or Synapse Pipelines that read/write files.
                                                           
                                                           You must know how to handle file formats (CSV, JSON, Parquet), manage access, and avoid overwriting sensitive data.
                                                           
                                                           🔹 SQL UNION
                                                           You’ll often write SQL queries in Synapse or Databricks to merge data from multiple sources.
                                                           
                                                           In banking, this could mean combining customer data, transaction logs, or compliance reports.
                                                           
                                                           Understanding UNION vs UNION ALL helps you control data quality, performance, and auditability.
                                                           
                                                           🎓 Summary
                                                           Concept	What You Learned	Real-World Relevance
                                                           Python File Modes	'r', 'w', 'a', 'x', 'b', 't', 'r+'	Used in ETL, logging, secure file handling
                                                           Line Counting	readlines() vs loop	Efficient file processing
                                                           SQL UNION	Removes duplicates	Clean reporting
                                                           SQL UNION ALL	Keeps duplicates	Raw data aggregation
                                                           Interview Focus	Performance, deduplication, schema matching	Critical for banking data pipelines


Sep 5 (Fri)

Python: OOP – Classes & Objects

Theory Q: What is init in Python?

Code Q: Create a Student class with attributes and display details.


SQL: Subqueries

Theory Q: Difference between correlated and non-correlated subquery?

Code Q: Find employees whose salary > average salary.

                                                               🐍 PYTHON: OOP – Classes & Objects
                                                               ✅ Theory Q: What is __init__ in Python?
                                                               __init__ is a special method in Python called a constructor. It runs automatically when you create an object from a class.
                                                               
                                                               🔍 Think of it like this:
                                                               Imagine a class is a blueprint for building a robot. The __init__ method is the setup button that gives each robot its name, color, and size when it’s built.
                                                               
                                                               📘 Technical Explanation:
                                                               __init__ is used to initialize attributes of an object.
                                                               
                                                               It always takes self as the first parameter (which refers to the object itself).
                                                               
                                                               You can pass other parameters to set values like name, age, etc.
                                                               
                                                               🧠 Interview Tip:
                                                               If asked “What does __init__ do?”, say:
                                                               
                                                               “It’s the constructor method that initializes object attributes when a class instance is created. It helps set up the object’s internal state.”
                                                               
                                                               💻 Code Q: Create a Student class with attributes and display details
                                                               python
                                                               class Student:
                                                                   def __init__(self, name, roll_number, age, grade):
                                                                       self.name = name
                                                                       self.roll_number = roll_number
                                                                       self.age = age
                                                                       self.grade = grade
                                                               
                                                                   def display_details(self):
                                                                       print("Student Name:", self.name)
                                                                       print("Roll Number:", self.roll_number)
                                                                       print("Age:", self.age)
                                                                       print("Grade:", self.grade)
                                                               
                                                               # Creating an object
                                                               student1 = Student("Anji", 101, 22, "A")
                                                               student1.display_details()
                                                               🧠 Interview Tip:
                                                               Explain how self binds the attributes to the object, and how methods like display_details() allow encapsulated access to data.
                                                               
                                                               🧮 SQL: Subqueries
                                                               ✅ Theory Q: Difference Between Correlated and Non-Correlated Subqueries
                                                               Feature	Non-Correlated Subquery	Correlated Subquery
                                                               Dependency	Independent of outer query	Depends on outer query
                                                               Execution	Runs once	Runs for every row in outer query
                                                               Performance	Faster	Slower due to repeated execution
                                                               Use Case	Aggregate comparisons, filtering	Row-by-row filtering, conditional logic
                                                               Example Use	Compare salary to overall average	Compare salary to department average
                                                               🧠 Think of it like this:
                                                               Non-Correlated: Like checking the average score of the whole class once.
                                                               
                                                               Correlated: Like checking if each student scored above their own section’s average.
                                                               
                                                               💻 Code Q: Find employees whose salary > average salary
                                                               ✅ Non-Correlated Subquery Example:
                                                               sql
                                                               SELECT employee_name, salary
                                                               FROM employees
                                                               WHERE salary > (SELECT AVG(salary) FROM employees);
                                                               SELECT AVG(salary) runs once and returns a single value.
                                                               
                                                               The outer query compares each employee’s salary to that value.
                                                               
                                                               ✅ Correlated Subquery Example (by department):
                                                               sql
                                                               SELECT employee_name, salary, department_id
                                                               FROM employees e
                                                               WHERE salary > (
                                                                   SELECT AVG(salary)
                                                                   FROM employees
                                                                   WHERE department_id = e.department_id
                                                               );
                                                               The subquery runs for each employee, calculating the average salary of their department.
                                                               
                                                               This is useful in banking analytics to compare performance or detect anomalies.
                                                               
                                                               🧠 Interview Tip for Azure Data Engineer at Fifth Third Bank:
                                                               “In fraud analytics, I’ve used correlated subqueries to compare transaction amounts against customer-specific averages. For example, flagging transactions that exceed a customer’s typical spend pattern. In Azure Synapse or SQL Server, I optimize these queries using indexed views or materialized results when performance is critical.”
                                                               
                                                               🧩 Summary for Interviews
                                                               Concept	What to Say in Interviews
                                                               __init__	“It’s the constructor that initializes object attributes when an instance is created.”
                                                               Student Class	“I used OOP to encapsulate student data and methods for clean, reusable code.”
                                                               Subqueries	“I understand both correlated and non-correlated subqueries and use them for analytics.”
                                                               Real-World Use	“At Fifth Third Bank, I used SQL subqueries to compare transaction patterns and detect fraud.”



---

Week 3

Sep 8 (Mon)

Python: OOP – Inheritance

Theory Q: What is multiple inheritance? How does Python handle it?

Code Q: Demonstrate single & multiple inheritance with classes.


SQL: EXISTS & IN

Theory Q: Difference between IN and EXISTS?

Code Q: Find employees working in departments that exist in dept table.

in the same way explain each and every concept related to these along with heading 
and make sure this covers all the topics related to these in any interviewer POV no matter how hard the interview maybe 
and also give real time usecase of my client 5/3 bank

                                                                       
                                                                       🐍 Python OOP – Inheritance
                                                                       🔍 What Is Inheritance?
                                                                       Inheritance is a core concept in Object-Oriented Programming (OOP) where a class (child) can inherit attributes and methods from another class (parent). It promotes code reuse, modularity, and scalability.
                                                                       
                                                                       🧠 Types of Inheritance in Python
                                                                       Type	Description
                                                                       Single Inheritance	One child class inherits from one parent class.
                                                                       Multiple Inheritance	One child class inherits from more than one parent class.
                                                                       Multilevel Inheritance	A class inherits from a class that itself inherits from another class.
                                                                       Hierarchical Inheritance	Multiple child classes inherit from a single parent class.
                                                                       Hybrid Inheritance	A combination of multiple types of inheritance.
                                                                       🔍 What Is Multiple Inheritance?
                                                                       A class inherits from two or more parent classes.
                                                                       
                                                                       Python supports this directly using the syntax: class Child(Parent1, Parent2):
                                                                       
                                                                       Python uses Method Resolution Order (MRO) to resolve conflicts when multiple parents have methods with the same name.
                                                                       
                                                                       ⚠️ Diamond Problem
                                                                       Occurs when multiple paths lead to the same base class. Python resolves this using C3 Linearization (MRO).
                                                                       
                                                                       python
                                                                       class A:
                                                                           def show(self):
                                                                               print("A")
                                                                       
                                                                       class B(A):
                                                                           def show(self):
                                                                               print("B")
                                                                       
                                                                       class C(A):
                                                                           def show(self):
                                                                               print("C")
                                                                       
                                                                       class D(B, C):
                                                                           pass
                                                                       
                                                                       d = D()
                                                                       d.show()  # Output: B (MRO chooses B over C)
                                                                       💻 Code Examples
                                                                       ✅ Single Inheritance
                                                                       python
                                                                       class Bank:
                                                                           def bank_name(self):
                                                                               print("Fifth Third Bank")
                                                                       
                                                                       class Employee(Bank):
                                                                           def emp_details(self):
                                                                               print("Data Engineer")
                                                                       
                                                                       e = Employee()
                                                                       e.bank_name()
                                                                       e.emp_details()
                                                                       ✅ Multiple Inheritance
                                                                       python
                                                                       class AzureSkills:
                                                                           def azure(self):
                                                                               print("Azure Data Factory, Synapse")
                                                                       
                                                                       class PythonSkills:
                                                                           def python(self):
                                                                               print("Python, PySpark")
                                                                       
                                                                       class DataEngineer(AzureSkills, PythonSkills):
                                                                           def role(self):
                                                                               print("Azure Data Engineer")
                                                                       
                                                                       de = DataEngineer()
                                                                       de.azure()
                                                                       de.python()
                                                                       de.role()
                                                                       🧑‍💼 Real-Time Use Case @ 5/3 Bank
                                                                       “We use multiple inheritance to build modular ETL components. For example, one class handles Azure Synapse connectivity, another handles PySpark transformations, and a third class inherits both to orchestrate the full pipeline.”
                                                                       
                                                                 1. Stateless Logger (No __init__)
                                                                 python
                                                                 class Logger:
                                                                     def log(self, message):
                                                                         print("Log:", message)
                                                                 
                                                                 job = Logger()
                                                                 job.log("Pipeline started")  # ✅ Message passed at method call
                                                                 2. Stateful Logger (With __init__)
                                                                 python
                                                                 class Logger:
                                                                     def __init__(self, message):
                                                                         self.message = message
                                                                 
                                                                     def log(self):
                                                                         print("Log:", self.message)
                                                                 
                                                                 job = Logger("Pipeline started")  # ✅ Message stored at object creation
                                                                 job.log()
                                                                       🗃️ SQL – EXISTS vs IN
                                                                       🔍 Theory: Difference Between IN and EXISTS
                                                                       Feature	IN	EXISTS
                                                                       Purpose	Checks if a value exists in a list	Checks if a subquery returns any rows
                                                                       Execution	Subquery runs once	Subquery runs for each row in outer query
                                                                       Performance	Better for small datasets	Better for large datasets
                                                                       NULL Handling	May fail with NULLs	Handles NULLs gracefully
                                                                       Use Case	Static lists or small subqueries	Dynamic existence checks
                                                                       💻 Code: Find Employees in Valid Departments
                                                                       ✅ Using IN
                                                                       sql
                                                                       SELECT employee_id, name
                                                                       FROM employees
                                                                       WHERE department_id IN (
                                                                           SELECT department_id FROM departments
                                                                       );
                                                                       ✅ Using EXISTS
                                                                       sql
                                                                       SELECT e.employee_id, e.name
                                                                       FROM employees e
                                                                       WHERE EXISTS (
                                                                           SELECT 1
                                                                           FROM departments d
                                                                           WHERE d.department_id = e.department_id
                                                                       );
                                                                       🧑‍💼 Real-Time Use Case @ 5/3 Bank
                                                                       “We use EXISTS in Azure SQL Database to validate employee records against active departments. This ensures data integrity during ETL loads. For example, before syncing HR data to Synapse, we check if the department exists using EXISTS to avoid orphan records.”
                                                                       
                                                                       🧠 Interview-Ready Insights
                                                                       🔹 Python Inheritance
                                                                       Be ready to explain MRO and the diamond problem.
                                                                       
                                                                       Use real-world analogies like “inheritance in a family tree.”
                                                                       
                                                                       Mention how you modularize ETL logic using class hierarchies.
                                                                       
                                                                       🔹 SQL EXISTS vs IN
                                                                       Know when to use each based on dataset size.
                                                                       
                                                                       Be prepared to discuss performance implications in Azure Synapse.
                                                                       
                                                                       Mention how you use these in data validation and governance.
                                                                       
                                                                       🧩 Bonus: How to Extend These Concepts
                                                                       Use Python inheritance to build custom logging, error handling, or data connectors.
                                                                       
                                                                       Use SQL EXISTS in data quality checks, referential integrity, or access control filters.
Sep 9 (Tue)

Python: OOP – Polymorphism

Theory Q: What is method overriding?

Code Q: Implement method overriding with Animal → Dog class.


SQL: ANY & ALL

Theory Q: Difference between ANY and ALL operators?

Code Q: Find employees earning more than ALL employees in dept 10.


                                                                         🐍 Python OOP – Polymorphism & Method Overriding
                                                                         📘 Theory: What Is Method Overriding?
                                                                         Method overriding allows a subclass to provide a specific implementation of a method that is already defined in its parent class.
                                                                         
                                                                         🔍 Key Concepts:
                                                                         Enables polymorphism: same method name, different behavior.
                                                                         
                                                                         Promotes code reuse and specialization.
                                                                         
                                                                         The method in the child class replaces the one in the parent class when called on a child object.
                                                                         
                                                                         ✅ Why It Matters:
                                                                         You can treat different objects uniformly while letting them behave differently.
                                                                         
                                                                         Makes your code scalable, clean, and extensible.
                                                                         
                                                                         🧪 Code: Animal → Dog Class (Method Overriding)
                                                                         python
                                                                         class Animal:
                                                                             def speak(self):
                                                                                 return "Animal makes a sound"
                                                                         
                                                                         class Dog(Animal):
                                                                             def speak(self):
                                                                                 return "Dog barks"
                                                                         
                                                                         # Example usage
                                                                         animal = Animal()
                                                                         dog = Dog()
                                                                         
                                                                         print(animal.speak())  # Output: Animal makes a sound
                                                                         print(dog.speak())     # Output: Dog barks
                                                                         🔍 Explanation:
                                                                         Dog inherits from Animal.
                                                                         
                                                                         Dog overrides the speak() method.
                                                                         
                                                                         When dog.speak() is called, Python uses the child class’s version.
                                                                         
                                                                         🏦 Real-Time Use Case at Fifth Third Bank
                                                                         Imagine you're building a transaction validation engine:
                                                                         
                                                                         python
                                                                         class Transaction:
                                                                             def validate(self):
                                                                                 return "Basic validation"
                                                                         
                                                                         class WireTransfer(Transaction):
                                                                             def validate(self):
                                                                                 return "Validate SWIFT code"
                                                                         
                                                                         class ACHTransfer(Transaction):
                                                                             def validate(self):
                                                                                 return "Validate routing number"
                                                                         Now you can loop through transactions:
                                                                         
                                                                         python
                                                                         transactions = [WireTransfer(), ACHTransfer()]
                                                                         for txn in transactions:
                                                                             print(txn.validate())
                                                                         Each transaction knows how to validate itself—no need for if statements or manual type checks.
                                                                         
                                                                         💬 Interview Tip: “We used method overriding to encapsulate validation logic for different transaction types. This allowed our Azure Data Factory pipelines to process diverse financial records without branching logic.”
                                                                         
                                                                         🗃️ SQL – ANY & ALL Operators
                                                                         📘 Theory: Difference Between ANY and ALL
                                                                         🔹 ANY Operator
                                                                         Returns TRUE if the condition is true for at least one value in the subquery.
                                                                         
                                                                         Think: “Is this value greater than any one of the others?”
                                                                         
                                                                         🔹 ALL Operator
                                                                         Returns TRUE only if the condition is true for every value in the subquery.
                                                                         
                                                                         Think: “Is this value greater than all of the others?”
                                                                         
                                                                         🔍 Comparison Table
                                                                         Operator	Condition Must Be True For	Use Case
                                                                         ANY	At least one value	Loose comparison
                                                                         ALL	Every value	Strict comparison
                                                                         🧪 Code: Employees Earning More Than ALL in Dept 10
                                                                         sql
                                                                         SELECT * FROM employees
                                                                         WHERE salary > ALL (
                                                                           SELECT salary FROM employees WHERE dept_id = 10
                                                                         );
                                                                         🔍 Explanation:
                                                                         Subquery returns all salaries in department 10.
                                                                         
                                                                         Outer query returns employees whose salary is greater than every salary in that department.
                                                                         
                                                                         🏦 Real-Time Use Case at Fifth Third Bank
                                                                         Imagine you're analyzing executive compensation:
                                                                         
                                                                         Use ALL to find employees earning more than everyone in a specific department (e.g., Risk Management).
                                                                         
                                                                         Use ANY to find employees earning more than at least one person in that department.
                                                                         
                                                                         💬 Interview Tip: “We used ALL to identify outlier salaries for compliance audits. By comparing executive pay against departmental benchmarks, we flagged anomalies and pushed alerts into Azure Synapse for downstream analysis.”
                                                                         
                                                                         ✅ Final Summary
                                                                         Topic	Theory	Code	Real-World Use
                                                                         Python Method Overriding	Child class redefines parent method	Dog.speak() overrides Animal.speak()	Transaction-specific validation logic
                                                                         SQL ANY	True if condition matches any value	salary > ANY (...)	Loose salary comparison
                                                                         SQL ALL	True if condition matches all values	salary > ALL (...)	Strict salary benchmarking





IN,ANY AND ALL lo where condition lo ay column name istamo adhe column name ni retrive cheyali sub query lo
select/....where salary > (select salary...) 

only existlo matram no need of column name Select.....where exists (select 1....)
Sep 10 (Wed)

Python: OOP – Encapsulation

Theory Q: What is the purpose of private variables in Python?

Code Q: Create a BankAccount class with deposit & withdraw methods.


SQL: CASE statement

Theory Q: When do we use CASE in SQL?

Code Q: Show employees with grade ‘High’ if salary > 70k else ‘Low’.

                                              🐍 Python OOP: Encapsulation
                                              📘 1. What Is Encapsulation?
                                              Encapsulation is one of the four pillars of Object-Oriented Programming (OOP), alongside Inheritance, Polymorphism, and Abstraction.
                                              
                                              🔐 Definition:
                                              Encapsulation means hiding internal object details and exposing only necessary parts through methods. It protects data and enforces controlled access.
                                              
                                              🎯 2. Purpose of Private Variables in Python
                                              Prevent accidental modification of sensitive data
                                              
                                              Enforce business rules through controlled access
                                              
                                              Improve security, maintainability, and data integrity
                                              
                                              🔍 Python's Approach:
                                              _variable: Protected (by convention)
                                              
                                              __variable: Private (via name mangling)
                                              
                                              💻 3. Code Example: BankAccount Class
                                              python
                                              class BankAccount:
                                                  def __init__(self, account_holder, balance=0):
                                                      self.account_holder = account_holder
                                                      self.__balance = balance  # Private variable
                                              
                                                  def deposit(self, amount):
                                                      if amount > 0:
                                                          self.__balance += amount
                                                          print(f"Deposited ₹{amount}. New balance: ₹{self.__balance}")
                                                      else:
                                                          print("Invalid deposit amount.")
                                              
                                                  def withdraw(self, amount):
                                                      if 0 < amount <= self.__balance:
                                                          self.__balance -= amount
                                                          print(f"Withdrew ₹{amount}. New balance: ₹{self.__balance}")
                                                      else:
                                                          print("Insufficient funds or invalid amount.")
                                              
                                                  def get_balance(self):
                                                      return self.__balance
                                              🧠 4. Deep Dive: Interview Concepts
                                              Concept	Explanation
                                              __balance	Private variable (encapsulation)
                                              get_balance()	Getter method
                                              deposit() / withdraw()	Business logic encapsulated
                                              __init__()	Constructor for initializing object state
                                              Direct access to __balance	❌ Not allowed (AttributeError)
                                              Access via _BankAccount__balance	⚠️ Possible but discouraged
                                              🔁 5. Polymorphism & Method Overriding
                                              Example:
                                              python
                                              class SavingsAccount(BankAccount):
                                                  def withdraw(self, amount):
                                                      print("Savings withdrawal rules apply")
                                              Same method name (withdraw) behaves differently
                                              
                                              This is runtime polymorphism via method overriding
                                              
                                              🧪 6. Stateful vs Stateless Design
                                              Design	Description
                                              Stateful	Stores data in object (self.__balance)
                                              Stateless	Passes data manually to each method
                                              Your code is stateful, which is preferred for real-world systems.
                                              
                                              🏦 7. Real-Time Use Case @ 5/3 Bank
                                              In banking systems:
                                              
                                              Encapsulation protects fields like account balance, credit score, and transaction history
                                              
                                              Prevents unauthorized access or manipulation
                                              
                                              Used in core banking APIs, loan processing, and fraud detection
                                              
                                              Example:
                                              
                                              python
                                              class CustomerProfile:
                                                  def __init__(self, name, credit_score):
                                                      self.name = name
                                                      self.__credit_score = credit_score
                                              
                                                  def get_credit_score(self):
                                                      return self.__credit_score
                                              🧮 SQL: CASE Statement
                                              📘 1. What Is CASE in SQL?
                                              CASE is a conditional expression used to return values based on logic — like if-else in programming.
                                              
                                              🎯 2. When Do We Use CASE?
                                              To categorize data based on conditions
                                              
                                              To replace multiple IFs or complex joins
                                              
                                              To simplify logic inside SELECT, WHERE, ORDER BY, etc.
                                              
                                              💻 3. Code Example: Employee Grade
                                              sql
                                              SELECT emp_id, emp_name, salary,
                                                     CASE 
                                                         WHEN salary > 70000 THEN 'High'
                                                         ELSE 'Low'
                                                     END AS grade
                                              FROM employees;
                                              ✅ Output:
                                              emp_id	emp_name	salary	grade
                                              101	Ravi	85000	High
                                              102	Priya	65000	Low
                                              🧠 4. Interview Concepts
                                              Concept	Explanation
                                              CASE WHEN	Conditional logic
                                              THEN / ELSE	Branching outcomes
                                              AS grade	Alias for new column
                                              Nested CASE	Supported for complex logic
                                              Used in SELECT, WHERE, ORDER BY	Versatile placement
                                              🏦 5. Real-Time Use Case @ 5/3 Bank
                                              In financial analytics:
                                              
                                              Used to segment customers based on salary, credit score, or transaction volume
                                              
                                              Example: Flag customers as ‘High Risk’, ‘Medium Risk’, or ‘Low Risk’
                                              
                                              sql
                                              SELECT customer_id,
                                                     CASE 
                                                         WHEN credit_score < 600 THEN 'High Risk'
                                                         WHEN credit_score BETWEEN 600 AND 750 THEN 'Medium Risk'
                                                         ELSE 'Low Risk'
                                                     END AS risk_category
                                              FROM customer_profiles;
                                              Used in:
                                              
                                              Loan eligibility filters
                                              
                                              Fraud detection
                                              
                                              Customer segmentation dashboards
                                              
                                              🧠 Final Interview Prep Summary
                                              Topic	Must-Know Concepts
                                              Python OOP	Encapsulation, private variables, __init__, method overriding
                                              SQL CASE	Conditional logic, nested CASE, usage in SELECT/WHERE/ORDER BY
                                              Real-world use	Banking systems, fraud detection, customer profiling
                                              Design patterns	Stateful vs stateless, getter/setter, polymorphism

Sep 11 (Thu)

Python: OOP – Abstraction

Theory Q: What is an abstract class in Python?

Code Q: Create an abstract class Vehicle with method drive().


SQL: Stored Procedures (Intro)

Theory Q: Difference between procedure and function?

Code Q: Write a procedure to increase all salaries by 10%.
                                                                                
                                                                                🐍 Python: OOP – Abstraction
                                                                                📘 Theory Q: What is an abstract class in Python?
                                                                                An abstract class in Python is a class that:
                                                                                
                                                                                Cannot be instantiated directly (you can't create objects from it)
                                                                                
                                                                                Is meant to be a blueprint for other classes
                                                                                
                                                                                Contains one or more abstract methods — methods that are declared but not implemented
                                                                                
                                                                                Forces child classes to implement those methods
                                                                                
                                                                                🔧 Why Use Abstract Classes?
                                                                                To enforce a consistent interface across subclasses
                                                                                
                                                                                To prevent incomplete implementations
                                                                                
                                                                                To support clean architecture and scalability
                                                                                
                                                                                Python provides abstract classes via the abc module:
                                                                                
                                                                                python
                                                                                from abc import ABC, abstractmethod
                                                                                💻 Code Q: Create an abstract class Vehicle with method drive()
                                                                                python
                                                                                from abc import ABC, abstractmethod
                                                                                
                                                                                class Vehicle(ABC):  # Abstract base class
                                                                                    @abstractmethod
                                                                                    def drive(self):
                                                                                        pass  # No implementation here
                                                                                
                                                                                # Example subclass
                                                                                class Car(Vehicle):
                                                                                    def drive(self):
                                                                                        print("Driving a car")
                                                                                
                                                                                # Usage
                                                                                v = Car()
                                                                                v.drive()  # Output: Driving a car
                                                                                🔍 Key Points:
                                                                                Vehicle is abstract — you cannot do v = Vehicle()
                                                                                
                                                                                drive() is abstract — every subclass must implement it
                                                                                
                                                                                This enforces structure and avoids missing logic
                                                                                
                                                                                🧮 SQL: Stored Procedures (Intro)
                                                                                📘 Theory Q: Difference between procedure and function?
                                                                                Feature	Procedure	Function
                                                                                Return Value	May or may not return a value	Must return a value
                                                                                Use in SQL	Called independently (EXEC)	Can be used in SELECT queries
                                                                                Purpose	Perform actions (e.g., update data)	Compute and return a result
                                                                                Side Effects	Can modify database	Usually read-only
                                                                                🔧 Summary:
                                                                                Use procedures for tasks like updating records, inserting data
                                                                                
                                                                                Use functions for calculations or returning values
                                                                                
                                                                                💻 Code Q: Write a procedure to increase all salaries by 10%
                                                                                ✅ SQL Server Example:
                                                                                sql
                                                                                CREATE PROCEDURE IncreaseSalaries
                                                                                AS
                                                                                BEGIN
                                                                                    UPDATE Employees
                                                                                    SET Salary = Salary * 1.10;
                                                                                END;
                                                                                🔍 How to Run It:
                                                                                sql
                                                                                EXEC IncreaseSalaries;
                                                                                This procedure updates every employee's salary by 10%.
                                                                                
                                                                                🧠 Final Recap
                                                                                Topic	Concept	Code Summary
                                                                                Python Abstraction	Enforces method structure	Use ABC and @abstractmethod
                                                                                SQL Procedure vs Function	Action vs computation	Procedure modifies data, function returns value
                                                                                SQL Procedure Code	Salary update	UPDATE Employees SET Salary = Salary * 1.10
                                                                                -------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------
                                                                                
                                                                                🧠 Abstraction in Python — Success vs Failure
                                                                                We’ll explore 5 cases:
                                                                                
                                                                                Case	Abstract Setup	Can Create Object?	What Happens	Abstraction Status
                                                                                1️⃣	@abstractmethod + pass	❌ No (if not overridden)	TypeError	✅ Success
                                                                                2️⃣	@abstractmethod + raise NotImplementedError()	❌ No (if not overridden)	TypeError	✅ Success
                                                                                3️⃣	@abstractmethod + return "value"	✅ Yes	Returns value silently	❌ Failure
                                                                                4️⃣	Normal method + raise NotImplementedError()	✅ Yes	Error at method call	⚠️ Partial
                                                                                5️⃣	Normal method + return "value"	✅ Yes	Returns value silently	❌ Failure
                                                                                ✅ Case 1: Abstract method with pass — Success
                                                                                python
                                                                                from abc import ABC, abstractmethod
                                                                                
                                                                                class Transaction(ABC):
                                                                                    @abstractmethod
                                                                                    def validate(self):
                                                                                        pass
                                                                                
                                                                                class CryptoTransfer(Transaction):
                                                                                    pass  # ❌ Forgot to override
                                                                                
                                                                                txn = CryptoTransfer()  # ❌ Error
                                                                                🔥 Output:
                                                                                Code
                                                                                TypeError: Can't instantiate abstract class CryptoTransfer with abstract methods validate
                                                                                ✅ Python enforces abstraction — object creation fails.
                                                                                
                                                                                ✅ Case 2: Abstract method with raise NotImplementedError() — Success
                                                                                python
                                                                                from abc import ABC, abstractmethod
                                                                                
                                                                                class Transaction(ABC):
                                                                                    @abstractmethod
                                                                                    def validate(self):
                                                                                        raise NotImplementedError("Subclasses must implement this method")
                                                                                
                                                                                class CryptoTransfer(Transaction):
                                                                                    pass  # ❌ Forgot to override
                                                                                
                                                                                txn = CryptoTransfer()  # ❌ Error
                                                                                🔥 Output:
                                                                                Code
                                                                                TypeError: Can't instantiate abstract class CryptoTransfer with abstract methods validate
                                                                                ✅ Same enforcement — abstraction works perfectly.
                                                                                
                                                                                ❌ Case 3: Abstract method with return — Failure
                                                                                python
                                                                                from abc import ABC, abstractmethod
                                                                                
                                                                                class Transaction(ABC):
                                                                                    @abstractmethod
                                                                                    def validate(self):
                                                                                        return "validated"  # ❌ Should not return
                                                                                
                                                                                class CryptoTransfer(Transaction):
                                                                                    pass  # ❌ Forgot to override
                                                                                
                                                                                txn = CryptoTransfer()
                                                                                print(txn.validate())  # ✅ Runs
                                                                                ✅ Output:
                                                                                Code
                                                                                validated
                                                                                ❌ Python treats this as a normal method — abstraction fails silently.
                                                                                
                                                                                ⚠️ Case 4: Normal method with raise NotImplementedError() — Partial
                                                                                python
                                                                                class Transaction:
                                                                                    def validate(self):
                                                                                        raise NotImplementedError("Subclasses must implement this method")
                                                                                
                                                                                class CryptoTransfer(Transaction):
                                                                                    pass  # ❌ Forgot to override
                                                                                
                                                                                txn = CryptoTransfer()
                                                                                print(txn.validate())  # ❌ Error at runtime
                                                                                🔥 Output:
                                                                                Code
                                                                                NotImplementedError: Subclasses must implement this method
                                                                                ⚠️ No enforcement at object creation — error only appears when method is called.
                                                                                
                                                                                ❌ Case 5: Normal method with return — Failure
                                                                                python
                                                                                class Transaction:
                                                                                    def validate(self):
                                                                                        return "validated"
                                                                                
                                                                                class CryptoTransfer(Transaction):
                                                                                    pass  # ❌ Forgot to override
                                                                                
                                                                                txn = CryptoTransfer()
                                                                                print(txn.validate())  # ✅ Runs
                                                                                ✅ Output:
                                                                                Code
                                                                                validated
                                                                                ❌ No enforcement — method runs silently with default behavior.
                                                                                
                                                                                🧠 Final Takeaway
                                                                                To enforce abstraction properly:
                                                                                
                                                                                ✅ Use @abstractmethod with pass or raise NotImplementedError()
                                                                                
                                                                                ❌ Never return values inside abstract methods
                                                                                
                                                                                ⚠️ Avoid relying on runtime errors — enforce structure at object creation

Sep 12 (Fri)

Python: Modules & Packages

Theory Q: Difference between module and package in Python?

Code Q: Create a package with math utilities and import it.

                                                                                                                                                                                                          (
                                                                                                                                                                                                          create a add.py file
                                                                                                                                                                                                          def add(a,b):
                                                                                                                                                                                                              return a+b
                                                                                                                                                                                                          
                                                                                                                                                                                                          then do same to multiply 
                                                                                                                                                                                                          def multiply(a,b):
                                                                                                                                                                                                              return a*b
                                                                                                                                                                                                          
                                                                                                                                                                                                          now , we create an __init__ file
                                                                                                                                                                                                          from .add import add
                                                                                                                                                                                                          from .multiply import multiply
                                                                                                                                                                                                          
                                                                                                                                                                                                          now we keep all this files in a folder named math_utils
                                                                                                                                                                                                          
                                                                                                                                                                                                          -----------------------------------------------------------
                                                                                                                                                                                                          main code
                                                                                                                                                                                                          
                                                                                                                                                                                                          from math_utils import add, multiply
                                                                                                                                                                                                          adding = add(3,5)
                                                                                                                                                                                                          print(adding)

                                                                                                                           
                                                                                                                           🟢 Step 0: Prerequisites
                                                                                                                           Before we begin, make sure:
                                                                                                                           
                                                                                                                           You have Python installed (check by running python --version in your terminal)
                                                                                                                           
                                                                                                                           You have a code editor (like VS Code, PyCharm, or even Notepad++)
                                                                                                                           
                                                                                                                           You know how to navigate folders on your computer
                                                                                                                           
                                                                                                                           🟡 Step 1: Create Your Project Folder
                                                                                                                           Let’s call your project my_project.
                                                                                                                           
                                                                                                                           Open your file explorer
                                                                                                                           
                                                                                                                           Create a folder named my_project
                                                                                                                           
                                                                                                                           Inside my_project, create another folder called math_utils
                                                                                                                           
                                                                                                                           Your structure now looks like:
                                                                                                                           
                                                                                                                           Code
                                                                                                                           my_project/
                                                                                                                           └── math_utils/
                                                                                                                           🟠 Step 2: Create Your Modules
                                                                                                                           Inside math_utils, create these files:
                                                                                                                           
                                                                                                                           🔹 add.py
                                                                                                                           python
                                                                                                                           def add(a, b):
                                                                                                                               return a + b
                                                                                                                           🔹 multiply.py
                                                                                                                           python
                                                                                                                           def multiply(a, b):
                                                                                                                               return a * b
                                                                                                                           These are your modules—each .py file contains reusable functions.
                                                                                                                           
                                                                                                                           🔵 Step 3: Create __init__.py
                                                                                                                           Inside math_utils, create a file named __init__.py. This file makes math_utils a package.
                                                                                                                           
                                                                                                                           🔹 __init__.py
                                                                                                                           python
                                                                                                                           from .add import add
                                                                                                                           from .multiply import multiply
                                                                                                                           This tells Python:
                                                                                                                           
                                                                                                                           “When someone imports math_utils, give them access to add and multiply.”
                                                                                                                           
                                                                                                                           🟣 Step 4: Create Your Main Script
                                                                                                                           Go back to the my_project folder and create a new file called main.py.
                                                                                                                           
                                                                                                                           🔹 main.py
                                                                                                                           python
                                                                                                                           from math_utils import add, multiply
                                                                                                                           
                                                                                                                           print("Add:", add(5, 3))         # Output: 8
                                                                                                                           print("Multiply:", multiply(4, 2))  # Output: 8
                                                                                                                           🟤 Step 5: Run Your Code
                                                                                                                           Now open your terminal or command prompt:
                                                                                                                           
                                                                                                                           Navigate to your project folder:
                                                                                                                           
                                                                                                                           bash
                                                                                                                           cd path/to/my_project
                                                                                                                           Run your script:
                                                                                                                           
                                                                                                                           bash
                                                                                                                           python main.py
                                                                                                                           ✅ You should see:
                                                                                                                           
                                                                                                                           Code
                                                                                                                           Add: 8
                                                                                                                           Multiply: 8
                                                                                                                           Boom! You just created and used a Python package locally.
                                                                                                                           
                                                                                                                           🏦 Real-Time Use Case at Fifth Third Bank
                                                                                                                           At 5/3 Bank, developers use packages like this to:
                                                                                                                           
                                                                                                                           Organize financial tools (e.g., loan_utils, tax_utils)
                                                                                                                           
                                                                                                                           Share reusable code across teams
                                                                                                                           
                                                                                                                           Keep sensitive logic modular and testable
                                                                                                                           
                                                                                                                           💬 Interview Tip: “We built internal packages for financial calculations and exposed only validated functions via __init__.py. This helped us maintain clean architecture and reduce risk in production systems.”
                                                                                                                           
                                                                                                                           ✅ Final Folder Structure
                                                                                                                           Code
                                                                                                                           my_project/
                                                                                                                           ├── main.py
                                                                                                                           └── math_utils/
                                                                                                                               ├── __init__.py
                                                                                                                               ├── add.py
                                                                                                                               └── multiply.py
                                                                                                                           🧠 Summary of Key Concepts
                                                                                                                           Concept	What It Means
                                                                                                                           Module	A single .py file with reusable code
                                                                                                                           Package	A folder with modules + __init__.py
                                                                                                                           __init__.py	Controls what gets exposed when importing
                                                                                                                           Import Shortcut	from math_utils import add works because of __init__.py

                                                                           
                                                                           Without __init__.py:
                                                                           You’d have to write:
                                                                           
                                                                           python
                                                                           from math_utils.add import add
                                                                           from math_utils.multiply import multiply
                                                                           With __init__.py containing:
                                                                           python
                                                                           from .add import add
                                                                           from .multiply import multiply
                                                                           You can now write:
                                                                           
                                                                           python
                                                                           from math_utils import add, multiply

SQL: Functions in SQL

Theory Q: Difference between scalar and table-valued functions?

Code Q: Write a function to return total salary of a department.

                                                                                 
                                                                                 🧾 Code Q: Scalar Function to Return Total Salary of a Department
                                                                                 Let’s say you have a table called employees with columns:
                                                                                 
                                                                                 employee_id
                                                                                 
                                                                                 name
                                                                                 
                                                                                 salary
                                                                                 
                                                                                 department_id
                                                                                 
                                                                                 ✅ SQL Server Syntax
                                                                                 sql
                                                                                 CREATE FUNCTION dbo.TotalSalaryByDept(@DeptID INT)
                                                                                 RETURNS INT
                                                                                 AS
                                                                                 BEGIN
                                                                                     DECLARE @Total INT;
                                                                                 
                                                                                     SELECT @Total = SUM(salary)
                                                                                     FROM employees
                                                                                     WHERE department_id = @DeptID;
                                                                                 
                                                                                     RETURN @Total;
                                                                                 END;
                                                                                 🔹 How to Use It
                                                                                 sql
                                                                                 SELECT dbo.TotalSalaryByDept(3);  -- Returns total salary for department ID 3
                                                                                 ✅ This is a scalar function because it returns one value (the total salary).
                                                                                 
                                                                                 🧠 Internal Behavior Explained
                                                                                 Here’s what happens step-by-step when you call the function:
                                                                                 
                                                                                 You pass a department ID (e.g., 3)
                                                                                 
                                                                                 SQL runs the query:
                                                                                 
                                                                                 sql
                                                                                 SELECT SUM(salary) FROM employees WHERE department_id = 3
                                                                                 The result is stored in the variable @Total
                                                                                 
                                                                                 The function returns that value
                                                                                 
                                                                                 🔍 Can You Use Other Columns Inside?
                                                                                 Yes, but only for internal logic. You cannot return multiple columns from a scalar function.
                                                                                 
                                                                                 If you want to return a full list of employees, you need a table-valued function.
                                                                                 
                                                                                 📦 Table-Valued Function Example (Bonus)
                                                                                 ✅ Function to Return All Employees in a Department
                                                                                 sql
                                                                                 CREATE FUNCTION dbo.GetEmployeesByDept(@DeptID INT)
                                                                                 RETURNS TABLE
                                                                                 AS
                                                                                 RETURN (
                                                                                     SELECT employee_id, name, salary
                                                                                     FROM employees
                                                                                     WHERE department_id = @DeptID
                                                                                 );
                                                                                 🔹 How to Use It
                                                                                 sql
                                                                                 SELECT * FROM dbo.GetEmployeesByDept(3);
                                                                                 ✅ This returns a full table of employees in department 3.
                                                                                 
                                                                                 🏦 Real-Time Use Case at Fifth Third Bank (5/3 Bank)
                                                                                 At 5/3 Bank, SQL functions are used to:
                                                                                 
                                                                                 🔹 Scalar Functions
                                                                                 Calculate total payroll per department
                                                                                 
                                                                                 Return bonus amounts, tax deductions, or threshold flags
                                                                                 
                                                                                 Feed summary widgets in dashboards
                                                                                 
                                                                                 🔹 Table-Valued Functions
                                                                                 Return lists of employees, transactions, or alerts
                                                                                 
                                                                                 Power reporting tools and compliance filters
                                                                                 
                                                                                 Enable dynamic joins in analytics queries
                                                                                 
                                                                                 💬 Interview Tip: “We used scalar functions to encapsulate payroll logic and table-valued functions to drive dynamic reporting. This separation helped us optimize performance and maintain clarity in our analytics pipeline.”
                                                                                 
                                                                                 ✅ Interview-Ready Summary
                                                                                 Topic	Key Concept	Example
                                                                                 SQL Function	Reusable logic that returns a result	CREATE FUNCTION
                                                                                 Scalar Function	Returns one value	dbo.TotalSalaryByDept()
                                                                                 Table-Valued Function	Returns a table	dbo.GetEmployeesByDept()
                                                                                 Real-World Use	Payroll, reporting, dashboards	Used at 5/3 Bank for salary summaries
                                                                                 Best Practices	Avoid side effects, keep logic simple	Use indexes for performance


---

Week 4

Sep 22 (Mon)

Python: Iterators & Generators

Theory Q: Difference between iterator and generator?

Code Q: Write a generator for Fibonacci numbers.
                                                                     🧠 Headline: Why Iterators & Generators Matter
                                                                     Imagine reading a book one page at a time instead of loading the entire library into your brain. That’s what iterators and generators help you do with data—process it piece by piece, saving memory and making your code efficient.
                                                                     
                                                                     📘 Theory: Iterator vs Generator
                                                                     Feature	Iterator	Generator
                                                                     What is it?	An object that lets you loop through data	A special function that yields values one by one
                                                                     How to create?	Define a class with __iter__() and __next__()	Use yield inside a function
                                                                     Memory usage	Can be heavy (stores all data)	Lightweight (generates data on the fly)
                                                                     Syntax	More complex	Cleaner and simpler
                                                                     Use case	Custom iteration logic	Streaming large datasets
                                                                     🔍 Analogy:
                                                                     Iterator: Like a DVD player—you press "next" to go to the next scene.
                                                                     
                                                                     Generator: Like Netflix streaming—you get one scene at a time without downloading the whole movie.
                                                                     
                                                                     🧪 Code: Iterator Example
                                                                     Let’s build a custom iterator that returns squares of numbers:
                                                                     
                                                                     python
                                                                     class SquareIterator:
                                                                         def __init__(self, max):
                                                                             self.max = max
                                                                             self.num = 0
                                                                     
                                                                         def __iter__(self):
                                                                             return self
                                                                     
                                                                         def __next__(self):
                                                                             if self.num < self.max:
                                                                                 result = self.num ** 2
                                                                                 self.num += 1
                                                                                 return result
                                                                             else:
                                                                                 raise StopIteration
                                                                     
                                                                     # Usage
                                                                     for val in SquareIterator(5):
                                                                         print(val)
                                                                     🧠 What’s happening?
                                                                     
                                                                     __iter__() returns the iterator object.
                                                                     
                                                                     __next__() gives the next value until StopIteration is raised.
                                                                     
                                                                     ⚡ Code: Generator Example
                                                                     Now let’s write a generator for Fibonacci numbers:
                                                                     
                                                                     python
                                                                     def fibonacci_gen(limit):
                                                                         a, b = 0, 1
                                                                         count = 0
                                                                         while count < limit:
                                                                             yield a
                                                                             a, b = b, a + b
                                                                             count += 1
                                                                     
                                                                     # Usage
                                                                     for num in fibonacci_gen(10):
                                                                         print(num)
                                                                     🧠 What’s happening?
                                                                     
                                                                     yield pauses the function and returns a value.
                                                                     
                                                                     When resumed, it picks up right where it left off.
                                                                     
                                                                     🧩 Key Concepts to Master
                                                                     ✅ yield vs return
                                                                     return ends a function.
                                                                     
                                                                     yield pauses and resumes, perfect for streaming data.
                                                                     
                                                                     ✅ Lazy Evaluation
                                                                     Generators don’t compute all values at once—they wait until you ask.
                                                                     
                                                                     ✅ Memory Efficiency
                                                                     Ideal for large files, infinite sequences, or real-time data.
                                                                     
                                                                     🧠 Practice Challenges
                                                                     Generator for even numbers up to N
                                                                     
                                                                     Iterator for characters in a string
                                                                     
                                                                     Generator that yields prime numbers
                                                                     
                                                                     🧑‍🏫 Summary
                                                                     Use iterators when you need full control over iteration.
                                                                     
                                                                     Use generators when you want simplicity and memory efficiency.
                                                                     
                                                                     Both are powerful tools for writing clean, scalable Python code.
                                                🧪 Quick Demo
                                                python
                                                class MyIterator:
                                                    def __init__(self, max):
                                                        self.max = max
                                                        self.current = 0
                                                
                                                    def __iter__(self):
                                                        print("Calling __iter__")
                                                        return self
                                                
                                                    def __next__(self):
                                                        print("Calling __next__")
                                                        if self.current < self.max:
                                                            val = self.current
                                                            self.current += 1
                                                            return val
                                                        else:
                                                            raise StopIteration
                                                
                                                it = MyIterator(3)
                                                for val in it:
                                                    print("Value:", val)
                                                🖨️ Output:
                                                Code
                                                Calling __iter__
                                                Calling __next__
                                                Value: 0
                                                Calling __next__
                                                Value: 1
                                                Calling __next__
                                                Value: 2
                                                Calling __next__
                                                See? __iter__() is called once, then __next__() takes over.

SQL: Indexing

Theory Q: Difference between clustered and non-clustered index?

Code Q: Create an index on salary column.
give me everything needed in these topics to cover from 0 to 100 in a very cool way simply to understand for 
a fresher cover headline theory codes and all other required to understande these topics
EXPLAIN me step by step internally what happens in backend through code



Sep 23 (Tue)

Python: Decorators

Theory Q: What are decorators in Python?

Code Q: Create a decorator to log function execution time.


SQL: Views

Theory Q: Advantages of using views?

Code Q: Create a view showing employee name and dept.



Sep 24 (Wed)

Python: Itertools

Theory Q: What is itertools used for?

Code Q: Use itertools to generate all permutations of a list.


SQL: CTEs

Theory Q: Difference between CTE and subquery?

Code Q: Use CTE to calculate running total of salaries.



Sep 25 (Thu)

Python: Collections Module

Theory Q: What is Counter in collections?

Code Q: Count character frequency in a string using Counter.


SQL: Window Functions (ROW_NUMBER)

Theory Q: Difference between RANK, DENSE_RANK, ROW_NUMBER?

Code Q: Assign row numbers to employees ordered by salary.



Sep 26 (Fri)

Python: Multithreading

Theory Q: Difference between multithreading and multiprocessing?

Code Q: Create two threads printing even & odd numbers separately.


SQL: Window Functions (RANK, DENSE_RANK)

Theory Q: Difference between RANK and DENSE_RANK?

Code Q: Find top 3 earners in each department.




---

Week 5

Sep 29 (Mon)

Python: Multiprocessing

Theory Q: When to use multiprocessing instead of multithreading?

Code Q: Use multiprocessing to calculate squares of a list.


SQL: PARTITION BY

Theory Q: Difference between GROUP BY and PARTITION BY?

Code Q: Find running total of salary partitioned by dept.



Sep 30 (Tue)

Python: Virtual Environments

Theory Q: Why do we use virtualenv in Python?

Code Q: Create a virtual environment and install pandas.


SQL: Common Aggregations with Window

Theory Q: Difference between SUM() OVER and SUM() with GROUP BY?

Code Q: Show cumulative salary by employee order.



oct 1 (Wed)

Python: Pip & Package Management

Theory Q: Difference between pip and conda?

Code Q: Install numpy and check version in code.


SQL: Recursive CTE

Theory Q: What is a recursive CTE?

Code Q: Print hierarchy of employees under a manager.



oct 2 (Thu)

Python: JSON Handling

Theory Q: Difference between json.load() and json.loads()?

Code Q: Parse a JSON file of employee records.


SQL: Transactions

Theory Q: ACID properties in SQL?

Code Q: Demonstrate BEGIN, COMMIT, ROLLBACK.



oct 3 (Fri)

Python: Regex Basics

Theory Q: What are greedy vs non-greedy regex?

Code Q: Extract all emails from a text.


SQL: Triggers

Theory Q: What is a trigger in SQL?

Code Q: Create a trigger to log updates on salary.




---

Week 6

oct 6 (Mon)

Python: Advanced Regex

Theory Q: What is the use of lookahead and lookbehind in regex?

Code Q: Extract all numbers from a string using regex.


SQL: Normalization (1NF–3NF)

Theory Q: What is difference between 2NF and 3NF?

Code Q: Normalize a sample employee table to 3NF.



oct 7 (Tue)

Python: Date & Time

Theory Q: Difference between datetime.now() and utcnow()?

Code Q: Print current date in YYYY-MM-DD format.


SQL: Denormalization

Theory Q: When is denormalization used?

Code Q: Merge dept and employee table into a denormalized view.



Oct 8 (Wed)

Python: Logging

Theory Q: Why use logging instead of print()?

Code Q: Write logs to file with timestamp.


SQL: Stored Procedures Advanced

Theory Q: Can stored procedures return multiple result sets?

Code Q: Procedure to fetch top N salaries by dept.



Oct 9 (Thu)

Python: Unit Testing

Theory Q: What is unittest in Python?

Code Q: Write unittest for add(a, b).


SQL: Functions Advanced

Theory Q: Difference between deterministic and non-deterministic function?

Code Q: Write function to calculate factorial.



Oct 10 (Fri)

Python: Itertools Advanced

Theory Q: What is product() in itertools?

Code Q: Generate cartesian product of two lists.


SQL: Index Optimization

Theory Q: When does index slow down performance?

Code Q: Create composite index on (dept, salary).


------------------------------------------------------DATES WERE CHANGED TILL HERE ONLY ---------------------------------------------------------------------------------

Week 7

Oct 6 (Mon)

Python: CSV Handling

Theory Q: Difference between csv.reader and csv.DictReader?

Code Q: Read CSV and calculate column sum.


SQL: Temp Tables

Theory Q: Difference between temp table and table variable?

Code Q: Create a temp table for employees with salary > 70k.



Oct 7 (Tue)

Python: Pandas Intro

Theory Q: Difference between Series and DataFrame?

Code Q: Read CSV into DataFrame and show first 5 rows.


SQL: Optimization Basics

Theory Q: How to check execution plan in SQL?

Code Q: Compare query with and without index.



Oct 8 (Wed)

Python: Pandas Indexing

Theory Q: Difference between loc and iloc?

Code Q: Select all employees with salary > 50k using pandas.


SQL: Query Tuning

Theory Q: Difference between nested loop and hash join?

Code Q: Rewrite slow query using join optimization.



Oct 9 (Thu)

Python: Pandas GroupBy

Theory Q: Difference between groupby() and pivot_table()?

Code Q: Find average salary per dept in pandas.


SQL: Materialized Views

Theory Q: Difference between normal view and materialized view?

Code Q: Create materialized view of dept salaries.



Oct 10 (Fri)

Python: Pandas Merge & Join

Theory Q: Difference between merge and join in pandas?

Code Q: Merge employees with dept DataFrame.


SQL: Partition Tables

Theory Q: Why partition a table?

Code Q: Partition employees table by dept.




---

Week 8

Oct 13 (Mon)

Python: Numpy Basics

Theory Q: Difference between numpy array and Python list?

Code Q: Create numpy array and calculate mean.


SQL: OLAP vs OLTP

Theory Q: Difference between OLAP and OLTP?

Code Q: Show example schema for OLAP.



Oct 14 (Tue)

Python: Numpy Indexing & Slicing

Theory Q: Difference between shallow copy and deep copy in numpy?

Code Q: Slice numpy array into 2 halves.


SQL: Fact & Dimension Tables

Theory Q: Difference between fact and dimension tables?

Code Q: Design star schema with employee and dept.



Oct 15 (Wed)

Python: Numpy Operations

Theory Q: Difference between broadcasting and vectorization?

Code Q: Multiply two numpy arrays element-wise.


SQL: Slowly Changing Dimensions

Theory Q: Difference between SCD Type 1 and Type 2?

Code Q: Create SQL script for SCD Type 2 on employee table.



Oct 16 (Thu)

Python: Numpy Aggregations

Theory Q: What are axis parameters in numpy?

Code Q: Find sum across rows of 2D numpy array.


SQL: Data Warehousing Basics

Theory Q: Difference between star and snowflake schema?

Code Q: Write query for sales fact joining product dimension.



Oct 17 (Fri)

Python: Final Revision + Mini Mock

Theory Q: Explain Python memory management.

Code Q: Write function to check if string is palindrome.


SQL: Final Revision + Mini Mock

Theory Q: Difference between OLAP cube and star schema?

Code Q: Query top 5 earning employees with dept details.


 Phase 2: Oct 20 – Dec 12 (DSA + PySpark)

Oct 20 (Mon)

DSA: Arrays basics → Code: Reverse array | Theory: Array vs List

PySpark: Intro, RDD vs DataFrame → Code: Load CSV | Theory: RDD vs DF


Oct 21 (Tue)

DSA: Prefix Sum → Code: Subarray sum = k | Theory: Time complexity of prefix sum

PySpark: Transformations → Code: Word count | Theory: Lazy evaluation


Oct 22 (Wed)

DSA: Sliding Window (fixed) → Code: Max sum subarray k | Theory: Use case of sliding window

PySpark: Actions → Code: Count distinct | Theory: Transformation vs Action


Oct 23 (Thu)

DSA: Sliding Window (variable) → Code: Longest substring w/o repeat | Theory: Role of HashMap

PySpark: Joins → Code: Inner join DFs | Theory: Broadcast vs shuffle join


Oct 24 (Fri)

DSA: Two pointers → Code: 2-sum sorted | Theory: Two-pointer use

PySpark: Aggregations → Code: GroupBy sum, avg | Theory: groupBy vs reduceByKey


Oct 27 (Mon)

DSA: Binary Search basics → Code: Search rotated array | Theory: Complexity

PySpark: Window functions → Code: Rank by salary | Theory: PartitionBy


Oct 28 (Tue)

DSA: Binary Search on Answer → Code: Min capacity to ship | Theory: Monotonic function search

PySpark: UDF → Code: Clean string with UDF | Theory: UDF disadvantages


Oct 29 (Wed)

DSA: Sorting → Code: Quicksort | Theory: MergeSort vs QuickSort

PySpark: Caching → Code: Cache DF | Theory: Cache vs Persist


Oct 30 (Thu)

DSA: Hashing basics → Code: First non-repeating char | Theory: HashMap vs HashSet

PySpark: Partitioning → Code: Repartition DF | Theory: Repartition vs Coalesce


Oct 31 (Fri)

DSA: Hashing apps → Code: Subarray XOR = k | Theory: Hash collisions

PySpark: Broadcast → Code: Broadcast join | Theory: Benefits of broadcast var


Nov 3 (Mon)

DSA: Stacks basics → Code: Valid parentheses | Theory: Stack applications

PySpark: File formats → Code: Read Parquet | Theory: Parquet vs CSV


Nov 4 (Tue)

DSA: Queue basics → Code: Implement queue with stack | Theory: Queue uses

PySpark: Checkpointing → Code: Add checkpoint | Theory: Checkpoint vs cache


Nov 5 (Wed)

DSA: Monotonic stack → Code: Next greater element | Theory: Why monotonic stack?

PySpark: Accumulators → Code: Count errors | Theory: When to use accumulator


Nov 6 (Thu)

DSA: Linked list basics → Code: Reverse LL | Theory: Singly vs doubly LL

PySpark: Cluster manager → Code: Run on local vs yarn | Theory: Spark on YARN vs Standalone


Nov 7 (Fri)

DSA: Linked list apps → Code: Detect cycle | Theory: Floyd’s algorithm

PySpark: Data skew → Code: Salting example | Theory: What is data skew?


Nov 10 (Mon)

DSA: Recursion basics → Code: Factorial | Theory: Stack frame

PySpark: Catalyst optimizer → Code: Explain plan | Theory: Role of optimizer


Nov 11 (Tue)

DSA: Recursion apps → Code: Generate subsets | Theory: Recursion vs iteration

PySpark: Tungsten engine → Code: Simple DF ops | Theory: Tungsten advantages


Nov 12 (Wed)

DSA: Backtracking → Code: N-Queens | Theory: Backtracking vs brute force

PySpark: Partition tuning → Code: Repartition before join | Theory: Shuffle partitions


Nov 13 (Thu)

DSA: Greedy basics → Code: Activity selection | Theory: When greedy works?

PySpark: Joins perf → Code: Broadcast join | Theory: Skew join handling


Nov 14 (Fri)

DSA: Greedy apps → Code: Min coins change | Theory: Greedy vs DP

PySpark: Serialization → Code: Kryo serializer | Theory: Why serialization matters?


Nov 17 (Mon)

DSA: DP basics → Code: Fibonacci DP | Theory: Memoization vs tabulation

PySpark: Cluster tuning → Code: Executor config | Theory: Driver vs Executor


Nov 18 (Tue)

DSA: DP arrays → Code: Max subarray sum | Theory: Kadane’s algorithm

PySpark: Shuffle → Code: Wide vs narrow trans | Theory: Shuffle cost


Nov 19 (Wed)

DSA: DP grid → Code: Min path sum | Theory: DP states explanation

PySpark: AQE → Code: Enable AQE | Theory: AQE benefits


Nov 20 (Thu)

DSA: DP subsequence → Code: LCS | Theory: Applications of LCS

PySpark: Joins AQE → Code: Skew join fix | Theory: AQE join strategies


Nov 21 (Fri)

DSA: DP knapsack → Code: 0/1 Knapsack | Theory: Top-down vs bottom-up

PySpark: Partition strategy → Code: Hash vs range partition | Theory: Pros/cons


Nov 24 (Mon)

DSA: Trees basics → Code: Inorder traversal | Theory: BST vs Binary Tree

PySpark: Serialization deep → Code: Kryo example | Theory: Serialization overhead


Nov 25 (Tue)

DSA: Trees DFS → Code: Max depth | Theory: Preorder vs Postorder

PySpark: Resource tuning → Code: Spark conf example | Theory: GC in Spark


Nov 26 (Wed)

DSA: Trees BFS → Code: Level order traversal | Theory: BFS vs DFS usage

PySpark: Spill → Code: Sort merge join spill | Theory: Spill to disk


Nov 27 (Thu)

DSA: Binary Tree paths → Code: Root to leaf sum | Theory: Recursion in trees

PySpark: Checkpointing apps → Code: Streaming checkpoint | Theory: Use cases


Nov 28 (Fri)

DSA: BST basics → Code: Search BST | Theory: Why BST?

PySpark: Skew tuning → Code: Salting keys | Theory: Handling skew keys


Dec 1 (Mon)

DSA: BST ops → Code: Insert in BST | Theory: Balance in BST

PySpark: Catalyst plans → Code: df.explain | Theory: Physical vs logical plan


Dec 2 (Tue)

DSA: Heaps basics → Code: Heapify | Theory: Heap vs PriorityQueue

PySpark: Memory tuning → Code: Spark conf memory | Theory: Spill prevention


Dec 3 (Wed)

DSA: Heap apps → Code: Kth largest element | Theory: Heap use cases

PySpark: Broadcast tuning → Code: Cache + broadcast | Theory: Perf benefits


Dec 4 (Thu)

DSA: Graph basics → Code: BFS graph | Theory: Adj matrix vs list

PySpark: AQE partitions → Code: Coalesce partitions | Theory: AQE coalescing


Dec 5 (Fri)

DSA: Graph DFS → Code: Connected components | Theory: Recursion stack depth

PySpark: Shuffle deep → Code: Map vs reduce side join | Theory: Shuffle mechanics


Dec 8 (Mon)

DSA: Graph shortest path → Code: Dijkstra | Theory: Greedy in graphs

PySpark: Tungsten deep → Code: Encoders | Theory: Tungsten execution


Dec 9 (Tue)

DSA: Graph MST → Code: Kruskal | Theory: Union-Find DS

PySpark: CBO → Code: Spark SQL with stats | Theory: Cost-based optimizer


Dec 10 (Wed)

DSA: Graph cycle → Code: Detect cycle | Theory: Directed vs undirected cycles

PySpark: Spark SQL → Code: Register temp table | Theory: SQL vs DF perf


Dec 11 (Thu)

DSA: Graph topological sort → Code: Kahn’s algo | Theory: DAG in graphs

PySpark: Catalyst rule → Code: Explain join reordering | Theory: Catalyst benefits


Dec 12 (Fri)

DSA: Graph advanced → Code: Bellman-Ford | Theory: Neg cycle detection

PySpark: Wrap-up → Code: Word count DF | Theory: Spark internals overview



---

🔹 Phase 3: Dec 15 – Jan 23 (DW + Azure)

Dec 15 (Mon)

DW: Basics of OLTP vs OLAP → Code: Star schema SQL query | Theory: OLAP vs OLTP difference

Azure: Storage intro → Code: Upload file to Blob | Theory: Blob vs Data Lake


Dec 16 (Tue)

DW: Star vs Snowflake → Code: Write fact-dim join | Theory: Which schema is better?

Azure: ADLS Gen2 → Code: Mount storage in Spark | Theory: ADLS benefits


Dec 17 (Wed)

DW: Fact tables → Code: Aggregate fact data | Theory: Fact table types

Azure: Azure SQL DB → Code: Connect via Python | Theory: PaaS vs IaaS
[26/08, 9:25 am] anji❤: Phase 3: Azure Data Engineering (Dec 18 – Feb 27)


---

Week 13 (Dec 18 – Dec 19)

(Short week since we start on Thursday)

Dec 18 (Thu)

Topic: Intro to Azure Data Services

Theory: Overview of Azure SQL DB, Synapse, Data Lake, Data Factory

Hands-on: Create free Azure account & explore portal


Dec 19 (Fri)

Topic: Azure Storage Accounts

Theory: Types (Blob, ADLS Gen2, Queue, Table)

Hands-on: Create a Blob container, upload/download files using Azure Portal & Python SDK



---

Week 14 (Dec 22 – Dec 26)

Dec 22 (Mon)

Topic: Azure Data Lake Storage Gen2

Theory: Hierarchical namespace, access control (RBAC, ACL)

Hands-on: Mount ADLS in Databricks


Dec 23 (Tue)

Topic: Azure Blob Storage

Theory: Hot vs Cool vs Archive tiers

Hands-on: Lifecycle management policy


Dec 24 (Wed)

Topic: Azure Files & Queues

Theory: Use cases of File shares & Queues

Hands-on: Create queue and push messages


Dec 25 (Thu) 🎄 Holiday

Dec 26 (Fri)

Topic: Azure Data Factory (ADF) Basics

Theory: Pipelines, Linked Services, Datasets

Hands-on: Create pipeline to copy CSV → Blob



---

Week 15 (Dec 29 – Jan 2)

Dec 29 (Mon)

Topic: ADF Copy Activity

Theory: Integration Runtime, Data movement

Hands-on: Copy data Blob → SQL DB


Dec 30 (Tue)

Topic: ADF Data Flows

Theory: Mapping & Wrangling data flows

Hands-on: Transform JSON → Parquet


Dec 31 (Wed)

Topic: ADF Triggers & Monitoring

Theory: Schedule, Event, Tumbling Window triggers

Hands-on: Trigger pipeline every 1 hr


Jan 1 (Thu) 🎉 Holiday

Jan 2 (Fri)

Topic: ADF Parameters & Variables

Theory: Dynamic content, pipeline reusability

Hands-on: Parametrize source/destination paths



---

Week 16 (Jan 5 – Jan 9)

Jan 5 (Mon)

Topic: Azure Synapse Analytics – Intro

Theory: Dedicated SQL Pool vs Serverless SQL Pool

Hands-on: Create Synapse workspace


Jan 6 (Tue)

Topic: Synapse Serverless Queries

Theory: Query Parquet/CSV files directly from Data Lake

Hands-on: Run OPENROWSET queries


Jan 7 (Wed)

Topic: Dedicated SQL Pools

Theory: Distribution methods (Round Robin, Hash, Replicated)

Hands-on: Create fact & dimension tables


Jan 8 (Thu)

Topic: Synapse Pipelines vs ADF

Theory: Similarities & differences

Hands-on: Build Synapse pipeline for ETL


Jan 9 (Fri)

Topic: Synapse Security

Theory: Row-level security, column-level security

Hands-on: Implement RLS



---

Week 17 (Jan 12 – Jan 16)

Jan 12 (Mon)

Topic: Azure Databricks Intro

Theory: Apache Spark, Workspace setup

Hands-on: Create Databricks cluster


Jan 13 (Tue)

Topic: Databricks Notebooks

Theory: PySpark basics (DataFrame, RDD)

Hands-on: Read CSV & run transformations


Jan 14 (Wed)

Topic: Databricks & ADLS

Theory: Mounting ADLS, service principals

Hands-on: Mount ADLS to Databricks


Jan 15 (Thu)

Topic: Databricks Delta Lake

Theory: ACID transactions, Time travel

Hands-on: Create Delta table & update data


Jan 16 (Fri)

Topic: Databricks Optimizations

Theory: Caching, Partitioning, Z-Ordering

Hands-on: Optimize query performance



---

Week 18 (Jan 19 – Jan 23)

Jan 19 (Mon)

Topic: Azure Event Hub

Theory: Event streaming basics

Hands-on: Send events from producer


Jan 20 (Tue)

Topic: Azure Stream Analytics

Theory: Real-time queries on streams

Hands-on: Write query to aggregate events in real-time


Jan 21 (Wed)

Topic: Databricks Structured Streaming

Theory: Spark streaming concepts

Hands-on: Stream data from Event Hub → Databricks


Jan 22 (Thu)

Topic: Azure Data Lake + Streaming

Theory: Landing zones (raw, curated, trusted)

Hands-on: Store real-time data into ADLS


Jan 23 (Fri)

Topic: Kafka vs Event Hub

Theory: Differences & integration

Hands-on: Compare throughput test



---

Week 19 (Jan 26 – Jan 30)

Jan 26 (Mon) 🇮🇳 Holiday (Republic Day)

Jan 27 (Tue)

Topic: Azure Functions (Serverless)

Theory: Event-driven compute

Hands-on: Function to process Blob trigger


Jan 28 (Wed)

Topic: Logic Apps

Theory: Low-code workflows

Hands-on: Logic App to send email on Blob upload


Jan 29 (Thu)

Topic: Azure Key Vault

Theory: Secrets, Keys, Certificates

Hands-on: Store SQL password, access in ADF


Jan 30 (Fri)

Topic: Monitoring & Logging

Theory: Azure Monitor, Log Analytics, Alerts

Hands-on: Enable diagnostic logs for Data Factory



---

Week 20 (Feb 2 – Feb 6)

Feb 2 (Mon)

Topic: Azure DevOps Basics

Theory: Repos, Pipelines, Boards

Hands-on: Create repo for SQL scripts


Feb 3 (Tue)

Topic: CI/CD for Data Factory

Theory: ARM templates, Git integration

Hands-on: Deploy ADF pipeline via DevOps


Feb 4 (Wed)

Topic: CI/CD for Synapse

Theory: Deployment pipelines

Hands-on: Publish Synapse artifacts via DevOps


Feb 5 (Thu)

Topic: Databricks CI/CD

Theory: Notebooks versioning & deployment

Hands-on: Use DevOps pipeline for Databricks


Feb 6 (Fri)

Topic: Infra as Code (IaC)

Theory: Bicep, Terraform

Hands-on: Deploy Storage + ADF using Bicep



---

Week 21 (Feb 9 – Feb 13)

Feb 9 (Mon)

Topic: Azure Data Security

Theory: RBAC, Private Endpoints, Managed Identities

Hands-on: Restrict access via private endpoint


Feb 10 (Tue)

Topic: Encryption in Azure

Theory: SSE, CSE, TDE

Hands-on: Enable TDE for SQL DB


Feb 11 (Wed)

Topic: Networking in Azure

Theory: VNet, Subnets, Service Endpoints

Hands-on: Secure Synapse with VNet


Feb 12 (Thu)

Topic: Cost Management

Theory: Azure Pricing, Budgets

Hands-on: Set budget alerts


Feb 13 (Fri)

Topic: Governance

Theory: Policies, Blueprints

Hands-on: Apply policy to restrict VM size



---

Week 22 (Feb 16 – Feb 20)

Feb 16 (Mon)

Topic: Data Modeling in Azure

Theory: Dimensional modeling (facts & dimensions)

Hands-on: Build star schema in Synapse


Feb 17 (Tue)

Topic: Slowly Changing Dimensions in Azure

Theory: Type 1, 2, 3 in Synapse/ADF

Hands-on: Implement SCD Type 2 in ADF


Feb 18 (Wed)

Topic: Performance Tuning in Azure SQL

Theory: Indexing, statistics

Hands-on: Query optimization demo


Feb 19 (Thu)

Topic: Synapse Best Practices

Theory: Partitioning, Materialized Views

Hands-on: Partition large fact table


Feb 20 (Fri)

Topic: Data Lake Best Practices

Theory: Naming conventions, folder structure

Hands-on: Design folder structure for Data Lake



---

Week 23 (Feb 23 – Feb 27)

Feb 23 (Mon)

Topic: Power BI with Azure

Theory: DirectQuery vs Import from Synapse

Hands-on: Connect Power BI to Synapse


Feb 24 (Tue)

Topic: Power BI with Databricks

Theory: Lakehouse integration

Hands-on: Connect Power BI to Delta Lake


Feb 25 (Wed)

Topic: End-to-End Project Discussion

Theory: Batch + Streaming + Reporting

Hands-on: Design project architecture


Feb 26 (Thu)

Topic: End-to-End Project Implementation (Part 1)

Hands-on: Ingest data → Transform → Store in Synapse


Feb 27 (Fri)

Topic: End-to-End Project Implementation (Part 2)
